District of Columbia statutes.
32-532

Unenforceability of broadcasting industry contract provisions restricting employment after expiration of contract or termination of employment.

A broadcasting industry employment contract provision that requires an employee or prospective employee to refrain from obtaining similar employment with another broadcasting industry employer following expiration of the contract or upon termination of employment shall be unenforceable.

Mar. 27, 2003, D.C. Law 14-258, § 3, 50 DCR 246
This section is referenced in § 32-533.